Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3538
Secretary-treasurer; bond.

The secretary-treasurer of such district shall give a corporate surety bond, in such penal sum, not less than five thousand dollars, as the board of directors shall determine, conditioned upon the faithful performance of all duties imposed upon him and the faithful and accurate accounting for all money belonging to such district coming into his possession.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 10, p. 378;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.29.